Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws

§ 7-1-501.
Appointment of State Bar members as commissioners; duties.

The Governor shall appoint as commissioners to the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws three (3) members, in good standing, of The Mississippi Bar. In addition to the Governor’s appointees, the commission on uniform state laws shall consist of the following appointed commissioners, all of whom shall be members, in good standing, of The Mississippi Bar: a member of the Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House; any member of the bar who has been elected a life member of the conference; and the Directors of the Mississippi Law Research Institute, and the Senate and House Legislative Services Offices.

The commissioners so appointed shall confer and act with the commissioners of other states and territories in the formulation of uniform laws on all subjects. The commissioners shall prepare a report on their recommendations to be submitted to the Legislature for its consideration for adoption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 540, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 2000).

§ 7-1-503.
Appointment of associate members.

Two (2) associate members of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, all of whom shall be members, in good standing, of The Mississippi Bar, shall be appointed to act in accordance with the constitution and bylaws of the conference as follows:

The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint one (1) associate member from the staff of the Senate; and

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one (1) associate member from the staff of the House.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 540, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 2000).

§ 7-1-505.
Term of appointments; designation of substitute person to attend annual meeting in the absence of commissioner or associate member.

The commissioners and associate members shall serve until such time as they are removed or their successors are appointed by the aforesaid appointing authorities. In the event that a commissioner or associate member is unable to attend an annual meeting of the conference, the appointing authority shall designate a substitute person to attend the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 420, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 540, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 2000).